ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備 > ウォーターサーバー・浄水器 > ウォーターサーバー: 水飲み器; ウォーターチラー
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線 > 用水配送和過濾 > 飲水機: 噴嘴式飲水機; 水冷裝置
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения > Фильтрация и подача воды > Диспенсеры для воды: Питьевые фонтанчики; Водоохладители
ko: 철물 > 배관 > 급수/정수 > 정수기: 음수대; 수냉각기
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace > Dávkování a filtrace vody > Zásobníky pitné vody: Vodovodní pítka; Chladicí zařízení na vodu
hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték > Vízadagolás és szűrés > Vízadagolók: Ivókutak; Vízhűtők
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär > Trinkwasserspender & Filter > Wasserspender: Trinkbrunnen; Wasserkühler
ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare > Distribuirea și filtrarea apei > Dozatoare de apă: Fântâni de băut; Răcitoare pentru apă
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema > Doziranje i filtriranje vode > Dozatori za vodu: Fontane za piće; Hladnjaci za vodu
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod > Točenje in filtriranje vode > Dozatorji za vodo: Pitniki vode; Hladilniki vode
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici > Distribuzione/filtro acqua > Distributori d'acqua: Fontanelle; Refrigeratori ad acqua
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat > Su Dağıtım ve Arıtma Sistemleri > Su Sebilleri: Çeşmeler; Su Soğutucular
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika > Vandens dozavimas ir filtravimas > Vandens dozatoriai: Gėrimo fontanėliai; Vandens aušintuvai
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις > Συσκευές διανομής & φιλτραρίσματος νερού > Διανομείς νερού: Κρήνες πόσιμου νερού; Ψυκτικά νερού
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging > Vanndispensering og -filtrering > Vanndispensere: Drikkefontener; Vannkjøling
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri > Vattenautomater och vattenfiltrering > Vattenautomater: Dricksvattenfontäner; Kylanordning för vatten
da: Isenkram > Sanitet > Vanddispensere og filtrering > Vanddispenser: Drikkefontæner; Vandafkølere
fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt > Veden käyttöautomaatit ja suodatus > Vesiautomaatit: Juomalähteet; Vedenjäähdyttimet
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento > Distribuição e filtragem de água > Suportes para água: Fontes de água potável; Resfriadores de água
bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация > Дистрибуция и филтриране на вода > Диспенсъри за вода: Фонтани за пиене на вода; Водни охладители
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา > การจ่ายและกรองน้ำ > เครื่องจ่ายน้ำ: ก๊อกน้ำพุ; เครื่องทำน้ำให้เย็น
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk > Waterdispensers en -filters > Waterdispensers: Drinkfonteintjes; Koudwatermachines
vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống > Lọc và phân phối nước > Máy nước nóng lạnh: Vòi uống nước công cộng; Máy làm lạnh nước
en: Hardware > Plumbing > Water Dispensing & Filtration > Water Dispensers: Drinking Fountains; Water Chillers
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería > Filtración y distribución de agua > Dispensadores de agua: Fuentes para beber; Enfriadores de agua
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne > Dystrybucja i filtrowanie wody > Dystrybutory wody: Fontanny z wodą pitną; Chłodziarki do wody
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização > Distribuição e filtragem de água > Distribuidores de água: Fontes de água; Refrigeradores de água
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道 > 饮水机与净水器 > 饮水机: 饮水器; 冰水机
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie > Distribution et filtration de l’eau > Distributeurs d’eau fraîche: Fontaines à eau potable; Refroidisseurs industriels
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce > Dávkovanie a filtrácia vody > Dávkovače vody: Pitné fontány; Chladiče vody